Tennessee statutes. Title 4 State Government
Part 8

Tennessee Insurance Guaranty Association Bond Act of 1995

4-31-801. Short Title.

This chapter shall be known and cited as the “Tennessee Insurance Guaranty Association Bond Act of 1995.”

Acts 1995, ch. 240, § 1.

4-31-802. Legislative findings and declarations.

The general assembly finds and declares that if a natural disaster, as defined herein, causes, in whole or in part, an insolvency resulting in covered claims in excess of the association's capacity to pay from the assessments under §56-12-107(a)(3), it is proper to authorize the authority to issue bonds to expedite the handling and payment of covered claims against insolvent insurers operating in this state. It is determined to be in the best interest of and necessary for the protection of public health, safety, and general welfare of the residents of this state, and is hereby declared to be an essential public purpose to permit such actions as will provide relief to claimants and policyholders having covered claims against insolvent insurers operating in this state, by expediting the handling and payment of covered claims.

Acts 1995, ch. 240, § 1.

4-31-803. Part definitions.

As used in this part, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Association” means the Tennessee insurance guaranty association;

“Bonds” means all bonds, notes or other obligations issued by the authority under this part;

“Claim” or “claims” means a covered claim as defined in § 56-12-104, to be paid from the issuance of bonds under this part in the event of insolvencies as described in § 56-12-107(b)(3); and

“Natural disaster” means any hurricane, tornado, storm, flood, high water, wind-driven water, tidal wave, tsunami, earthquake, volcanic eruption, landslide, mudslide, snowstorm, ice storm, drought, fire, explosion, civil disturbance or other catastrophe that causes or may cause substantial damage or injury to property.

Acts 1995, ch. 240, § 1.

4-31-804. Issuance of bonds — Limitations on bond amounts — Source of funds.

The authority may issue bonds in an amount not to exceed the ability of the association to repay the bond indebtedness from assessments assessed pursuant to §§56-12-103(3) and56-12-107(b)(3), with the proceeds of such bond issuance to fund a loan to the association in accordance with the provisions of the bond documents under which the bonds are issued, and the association shall expend such loan funds for the purpose of paying to claimants or policyholders covered claims, as such term is defined in §4-31-803, arising through an insolvency. Any bonds issued by the authority under this section may all be payable from and secured by moneys received by or on behalf of the authority from assessments levied under §56-12-107(b)(3), and assigned and pledged under § 56-12-107(b)(3), to or on behalf of the authority for the benefit of the holders of such bonds in connection with such assistance program. The funds, credit, property, and taxing power of the state shall not be pledged for the payment of such bonds.

Acts 1995, ch. 240, § 1.

4-31-805. Review by commissioner of commerce
and insurance.

Prior to the issuance of bonds to pay covered claims in the event of an insolvency, the commissioner of commerce and insurance shall recommend the amount of unpaid covered claims to be paid from the bond issuance. In making its recommendation, the commissioner shall review whether the amount of assessments proposed by the association could service repayment of the bond indebtedness and whether the insurers have the ability to pay the assessments to be levied.

Acts 1995, ch. 240, § 1.

4-31-806. Negotiable bonds and notes.

For the purpose of providing moneys to fund loans authorized by this part, the authority, in addition to the powers otherwise created by law, has the power and is hereby authorized to issue from time to time negotiable bonds and notes of the authority in accordance with the following terms:

The authority shall establish a repayment schedule to be made under a loan agreement. The repayments shall be in such amounts as will be at least sufficient, together with other funds available therefor, to pay the principal of, and interest on, bonds and notes issued by the authority for the purpose of providing loans to the association for the payment of covered claims as defined in § 4-31-803 in the event of an insolvency, and as may be necessary for the authority to maintain a reserve for debt service. The authority may collect a reasonable administrative fee in addition to such repayment schedule in an amount as may be set forth in the loan agreement;

The annual repayment schedule for each loan shall be, in cases prior to the funding of such loans or where such loans have been financed on an interim basis other than by bonds, an estimated annual repayment schedule showing debt service requirements under the loan agreement as if the bonds to be issued to fund such loans will bear interest at a rate per annum and mature in such manner as the authority shall establish at the time of the approval of each such loan and, in cases where bonds have been issued to fund such loan, the actual debt service requirements on such bonds.

Acts 1995, ch. 240, § 1.

4-31-807. Administration of loans.

The authority shall administer loans made under this part.

In so doing, the authority may adopt rules and regulations necessary for the effective administration of this part, including the promulgation of prerequisites that must be fulfilled by the association in order to be eligible for a loan, procedures to be followed in making loan applications to the authority, procedures to be followed in the disbursement of loan funds, and procedures for enforcing loan agreements entered into by the association with the authority.

Acts 1995, ch. 240, § 1.

4-31-808. Loan agreements.

Any loan agreement may include such provisions as may be agreed upon by the authority and the association and shall include, in substance, the following:

The amount of the loan as determined by the authority; and

An agreement by the association to:

Proceed expeditiously with and complete payment of the claims in accordance with the loan agreement approved pursuant to this part;

Pledge any assessments and make payments according to the repayment schedule established by the authority; and

Establish and maintain adequate financial records for the payment of claims, cause to be made an annual audit of the financial records and transactions covering each fiscal year in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles, and furnish a copy of such audits to the comptroller of the treasury.

In addition to the foregoing, the authority shall administer loans made under this part only after it has determined that the association has the ability to repay the amount loaned.

Acts 1995, ch. 240, § 1.

4-31-809. Approval of agreements — Audits.

All loan agreements entered into pursuant to this part shall be subject to approval by the attorney general and reporter as to form and by the commissioner of finance and administration; all payments made pursuant to such loan agreement shall be approved by the authority, as to funding. All payments made to the association under the loan agreements are to be requested on forms approved by the authority in amounts consistent with the loan amount, and such payments shall be subject to audit at any time.

Acts 1995, ch. 240, § 1.

4-31-810. Requirements and procedure.

The bonds and notes for claims payment shall be authorized by resolution of the authority, may be in one (1) or more series, shall bear such date or dates, and shall mature at such time or times, in the case of any such note or any renewals thereof, not exceeding eight (8) years from the date of issue of such original note, and in the case of any such bond not exceeding thirty (30) years from the date of issue, as such resolution or resolutions may provide.

The bonds and notes shall bear interest at such rate or rates, be in such denominations, be in such form, either coupon or registered, carry such registration privileges, be executed in such manner, be payable in such medium of payment at such place or places, and be subject to such terms of redemption as such resolution or resolutions may provide.

The bonds and notes may be sold at public or private sale, at such price or prices as the authority may provide.

Any resolution or resolutions authorizing any bonds or notes, or any series thereof, may contain the following provisions, which shall be a part of the contract with the holders thereof:

Pledging all or any part of the moneys that the authority is permitted by law to pledge, and securing the payment of the bonds or notes or of any series thereof, subject to such agreements with bondholders or noteholders as may then exist;

Creating and establishing such funds and accounts as may be deemed necessary or advisable and setting aside reserves or sinking funds and agreeing as to the maintenance, regulation and disposition thereof;

Limiting the issuance of additional bonds or notes, the terms upon which additional bonds or notes may be issued and secured, and the refunding of outstanding or other bonds or notes;

Prescribing the procedure, if any, by which the terms of any contract with bondholders or noteholders may be amended or abrogated, the amount of bonds or notes the holders of which must consent thereto, and the manner in which such consent may be given;

Investing in a trustee or trustees such property, rights, powers and duties in trust as the authority may determine, which may include any or all of the rights, powers and duties of the trustee appointed by the bondholders pursuant to § 4-31-106, and limiting or abrogating the right of the bondholders to appoint a trustee or limiting the rights, powers and duties of such trustee; and

Setting forth any other matters, of like or different character, that in any way affect the security or protection of the bonds or notes.

The authority, subject to such agreements with bondholders or noteholders as may then exist, shall have power to purchase bonds or notes out of any moneys available therefor at a price not exceeding the redemption price then applicable, plus accrued interest to the next interest payment date thereon, if the bonds or notes are then redeemable.

All bonds and notes so purchased shall be cancelled.

Neither the members of the authority nor any person executing the bonds or notes shall be liable personally on the bonds or notes or be subject to any personal liability or accountability by reason of the issuance thereof.

If any member of the authority whose signature or facsimile signature thereof shall appear on any bonds or coupons ceases to be a member of the authority before the delivery thereof, such signature or facsimile signature nevertheless shall be valid and sufficient for all purposes the same as if such member had remained a member of the authority until after such delivery.

Any pledge made by the authority pursuant to this chapter shall be valid and binding from the time when the pledge is made, the moneys, or property so pledged and thereafter received by the authority shall immediately be subject to the lien of such pledge without any physical delivery thereof or further act, and the lien of any such pledge shall be valid and binding as against all parties having claims of any kind in tort, contract or otherwise against the authority, irrespective of whether such parties have notice thereof.

Neither the resolution nor any other instrument by which a pledge is created need be recorded.

The bonds and notes shall not be invalid for any irregularity or defect in the proceedings for the issuance or sale thereof.

Such bonds and notes shall contain a recital that they have been authorized and issued pursuant to the laws of the state, including particularly this chapter, which recital shall be conclusive evidence of their validity and the regularity of their issuance.

Bonds and notes of the authority shall not constitute a debt or a pledge of the faith and credit of the state or a local governmental unit, and the holders or owners of such bonds and notes shall have no right to have taxes levied by the general assembly or any local governmental unit or any other taxing authority within the state for the payment of the principal of and interest and premium, if any, on such bonds and notes, but such bonds and notes shall be payable solely from the assessments pledged for their payment.

All such bonds and notes shall contain on the face thereof a statement to the effect that the bonds or notes are not a debt of the state, any local governmental unit, creating or participating municipality, any other taxing authority, or any airport authority or municipal airport within the state, but are payable solely from revenues and moneys pledged to the payment thereof.

The refunding bonds shall be sold and the proceeds applied to the purchase, redemption or payment of the bonds to be refunded.

Except as may otherwise be expressly provided by the authority, each issue of its bonds or notes issued pursuant to this section shall be limited special obligations of the authority, payable solely from and secured solely by moneys derived by the authority from all or a portion of payments made pursuant to the loan agreement with the association as provided in the resolution authorizing such bonds and notes.

If the authority defaults in the payment of principal of and interest and premium, if any, on the bonds or notes, the determination of such default and the remedies therefor shall be governed by § 4-31-106.

Acts 1995, ch. 240, § 1.

4-31-811. Tennessee insurance guaranty association fund.

The authority is hereby authorized to establish in the state treasury a special trust fund of the authority to be known as the “Tennessee insurance guaranty association fund.”

The state hereby covenants and agrees that from and after the issuance of any bonds or notes under and pursuant to this part, moneys derived by the state from payments made pursuant to loan agreements with the association as permitted under the terms of the loan agreements that are pledged to the payment of such bonds or notes shall be paid into the particular fund established for the issuance of bonds or notes to which such moneys are pledged.

Such moneys shall be accounted for separately from all other moneys in the treasury and shall be applied by the authority solely for the purpose of paying principal of and interest and premium, if any, on such issue of bonds and notes issued pursuant to this section, refunding moneys due to the association where appropriate, and paying all other costs incidental to the administration of the authority in connection with the loan agreements and the issuance of such issue of bonds and notes.

Acts 1995, ch. 240, § 1.

4-31-812. Powers of the authority.

The authority has the right, in addition to all other rights, by mandamus or other suit, action or proceeding in any court of competent jurisdiction, to require the association and the board of directors and any proper officer, agent or employee of the association to carry out any agreements and to perform its and their duties under this part or under any rule or regulation of the authority adopted pursuant thereto.

Acts 1995, ch. 240, § 1.

4-31-813. Applicability.

This part shall be in addition and supplemental to any other law providing for financing by the association and shall not be deemed to amend or repeal any other law.

No proceedings by the association shall be required for loan agreements hereunder, except as provided by this part, any law to the contrary notwithstanding.

Any requirements or restrictions applicable to borrowing by the association contained in any other law shall not be applicable to loans under this part.

Acts 1995, ch. 240, § 1.